District of Columbia statutes.
21-118

Counter security; petition by surety.

If a surety of a guardian by petition sets forth that he apprehends himself to be in danger of loss in consequence of his suretyship, and prays the court to be relieved, the court, after summoning the guardian to answer the petition, may require him to give counter security to indemnify his original surety or to deliver his ward’s estate into the hands of the surety or of another person. In either case, the court shall require sufficient security for the proper management and application of the estate to be given by the person into whose hands the estate is delivered, and make such other order as seems just.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-118.
1973 Ed., § 21-118.